District of Columbia statutes.
42-1124

Appropriations to carry out provisions of chapter.

There are hereby authorized to be appropriated such amounts as may be necessary for the carrying out of the provisions of this chapter, including the use of stamps or other devices for evidencing payment of the tax imposed by this chapter.

History

Mar. 2, 1962, 76 Stat. 17, Pub. L. 87-408, title III, § 324

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-944.
1973 Ed., § 45-744.